Utah statutes.
48-2c-906 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Allocation of profits and losses.

The profits and losses of a company shall be allocated among the members in the manner provided in the operating agreement.  If the operating agreement does not otherwise provide, profits and losses shall be allocated in proportion to the members' capital account balances as of the beginning of the company's current fiscal year.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

